District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0368.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Tenant and Rowhouse Short-Term Rental Clarification Amendment Act
of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Sec. 2. The Short-term Rental Regulation Act of 2018, effective April 25, 2019
(D.C. Law 22-307; D.C. Official Code § 30-201.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 101(4) is amended to read as follows:
“(4) “Primary residence” means the property is:
“(A) Eligible for the homestead deduction pursuant to D.C. Official Code § 47-
2201(g); or,
“(B) A residential unit leased to a natural person; provided, that at least two of the
following documents, that are not from the same business, company, or agency, are provided:
“(i) An unexpired Washington, D.C. driver’s license reflecting the


applicant’s name and current address, which shall be the same as provided in the application for
short-term rental license endorsement;
“(ii) Water, gas, electric, oil, internet, or cable bill with the applicant’s
name and address, issued within the last 60 days, which shall be the same as provided in the
application for short-term rental license endorsement;
“(iii) Telephone bill reflecting applicant’s name and current address,
issued within the last 60 days, which shall be the same as provided in the application for short-
term rental license endorsement;
“(iv) Official mail from any government agency reflecting the applicant’s
name and current address, issued within the last 60 days, which shall be the same as provided in
the application for short-term rental license endorsement; or,
“(v) Certificate of insurance reflecting the applicant’s name and current
address, issued within the last 60 days, which shall be the same as provided in the application for
short-term rental license endorsement.”.
(b) Section 102 is amended as follows:
(1) Subsection (e) is amended by adding a new paragraph (1) to read as follows:
“(1) The owner of a property with two principal dwelling units in a Residential
Flat (RF) zone, as defined by 11 DCMR §E100 et seq, may offer one of the units as a short-term
rental.”.
(2) A new subsection (g) is added to read as follows:
“(g) A host who demonstrates primary residency and obtains permission from their
landlord to operate a short-term rental pursuant to Section 101(4)(b) and 103(5), shall notify the
Department within 30 days of termination of the host’s lease, upon which the host’s short-term


rental license shall no longer be active.”.
(c) Section 103 is amended by adding a new paragraph (5) to read as follows:
“(5) If the short-term rental is eligible under Section 101(4)(b), the host shall provide
written confirmation from the landlord or the landlord’s designee that permits the host to obtain
and operate a short-term rental license on the property.”.
(d) Section 106 is amended by striking subsection (b).
(e) Section 108(a)(1) is amended to read as follows:
“(1) A booking service shall require a host to provide a Short Term Rental or Short Term
Rental: Vacation Rental license endorsement number for each listed short-term rental property
and shall display a property’s license endorsement number in a conspicuous location on the
listing page; provided, that the booking service shall not be held liable for a host providing a
false license endorsement number.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), a 30-day period of congressional review as
provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)), and publication in the District of
Columbia Register.